test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-atoom_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - atōm: # Noun 157 'eng /est aatom/fin' - full paradigm
     atōm+N+Sg+Nom: atōm
     atōm+N+Sg+Gen: atōm
     atōm+N+Sg+Par: atōmt
     atōm+N+Sg+Dat: atōmõn
     atōm+N+Sg+Ins: atōmõks
     atōm+N+Sg+Ill: atōmõ
     atōm+N+Sg+Ela: atōmõst
     atōm+N+Pl+Nom: atōmõd
     atōm+N+Pl+Gen: atōmõd
     atōm+N+Pl+Par: atōmidi
     atōm+N+Pl+Dat: atōmõdõn
     atōm+N+Pl+Ins: atōmõdõks
     atōm+N+Pl+Ill: atōmiž
     atōm+N+Pl+Ela: atōmist
